test/src/gt-norm-yamls/V-leasen_gt-norm.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.hfst
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.xfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.xfst
    App: lookup

Tests:

# todo:
# Proofread the gold standard (below)
# Then: run analyser, then correct. 


  Verb - leasen: # Verb 'to read' - full paradigm
     leasen+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: lease
     leasen+V+Ind+Prs+Sg2: least
     leasen+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: least
     leasen+V+Ind+Prs+Pl: [leaset, leasen]

     leasen+V+Ind+Prt+Sg1: leasde
     leasen+V+Ind+Prt+Sg2: leasdest
     leasen+V+Ind+Prt+Sg3: leasde
     leasen+V+Ind+Prt+Pl: leasden

     leasen+V+Inf:  leasen
     leasen+V+PrfPrc:  leasd
     leasen+V+PrsPrc:  leasen

     leasen+V+Imprt+Sg2:  leas
     leasen+V+Imprt+Pl2:  leaset
